Tennessee statutes. Title 48 Securities, Corporations And Associations
Part 2

Amendment of Bylaws

48-60-201. Amendment of bylaws by board of directors.

If a corporation has no members, its incorporators, until directors have been chosen, and thereafter its board of directors, may adopt one (1) or more amendments to the corporation's bylaws, subject to any approval required pursuant to § 48-60-301. The corporation shall provide notice of any meeting of directors at which an amendment is to be approved. The notice shall be in accordance with § 48-58-203. The notice must also state that the purpose, or one (1) of the purposes, of the meeting is to consider a proposed amendment to the bylaws and contain or be accompanied by a copy or summary of the amendment or state the general nature of the amendment. The amendment must be approved by a majority of the directors in office at the time the amendment is adopted.

Acts 1987, ch. 242, § 10.20.

Textbooks. Tennessee Forms (Robinson, Ramsey and Harwell), Nos. 5-1503, 5-1603, 5-2005.

48-60-202. Amendment of bylaws by board of directors or members.

A corporation's board of directors may amend or repeal the corporation's bylaws unless:

The charter or chapters 51-68 of this title reserve this power exclusively to the members in whole or in part; or

The members in amending or repealing a particular bylaw provide expressly that the board of directors may not amend or repeal that bylaw.

A corporation's members may amend or repeal the corporation's bylaws even though the bylaws may also be amended or repealed by its board of directors. An amendment to the bylaws shall be approved by members by two thirds (2/3) of the votes cast or a majority of the voting power, whichever is less. An amendment to the bylaws which relates solely to the dues required for membership and which establishes or changes a specific amount for dues shall be approved by a majority of the members present and voting unless the charter or bylaws specify a higher voting percentage.

An amendment or repeal of a bylaw requires the written approval of a third person or persons if the charter so provides in accordance with § 48-60-301.

Acts 1987, ch. 242, § 10.21; 1988, ch. 859, § 1.

Cross-References. Inapplicability of Nonprofit Corporation Act to certain rural electric and community services cooperatives, § 65-25-125.

48-60-203. Bylaw increasing quorum or voting requirement for members.

If expressly authorized by the charter, the members may adopt or amend a bylaw that fixes a greater quorum or voting requirement for members (or voting groups of members) than is required by chapters 51-68 of this title. The adoption or amendment of a bylaw that adds, changes, or deletes a greater quorum or voting requirement for members must meet the same quorum requirement and be adopted by the same vote and voting groups required to take action under the quorum and voting requirement then in effect or proposed to be adopted, whichever is greater.

A bylaw that fixes a greater quorum or voting requirement for members under subsection (a) may not be adopted, amended or repealed by the board of directors.

Except as provided in the charter or bylaws, the board of directors of a corporation that has one (1) or more members at the time may not adopt or amend a bylaw under:

Section 48-56-201 providing differences in rights and obligations of members;

Section 48-56-204 addressing member's liability for dues, assessments and fees;

Section 48-56-302 relating to termination;

Section 48-56-303 authorizing the purchase of memberships;

Section 48-58-108(a) requiring cause to remove a director;

Section 48-58-108(a) specifying what constitutes cause to remove a director;

Section 48-58-109 relating to removal of designated or appointed directors; or

Section 48-58-101(c) authorizing persons to exercise powers otherwise exercised by the board.

Acts 1987, ch. 242, § 10.22; 2014, ch. 899, § 62.

Cross-References. Inapplicability of Nonprofit Corporation Act to certain rural electric and community services cooperatives, § 65-25-125.

48-60-204. Bylaw increasing quorum or voting requirement for directors.

A bylaw that fixes a greater quorum or voting requirement for the board of directors may be amended or repealed:

By written approval of any person or persons whose approval is required by a charter provision authorized by § 48-60-301;

If originally adopted by the members, only by the members; and

If originally adopted by the board of directors, either by the members or by the board of directors.

A bylaw adopted or amended by the members that fixes a greater quorum or voting requirement for the board of directors may provide that it may be amended or repealed only by a specified vote of either the members or the board of directors.

Action by the board of directors under subdivision (a)(3) to adopt or amend a bylaw that changes the quorum or voting requirement for the board of directors must meet the same quorum requirement and be adopted by the same vote required to take action under the quorum and voting requirement then in effect or proposed to be adopted, whichever is greater.

Acts 1987, ch. 242, § 10.23.

Cross-References. Inapplicability of Nonprofit Corporation Act to certain rural electric and community services cooperatives, § 65-25-125.

48-60-205. Class voting by members on amendments.

The members of a class in a corporation are entitled to vote as a class on a proposed amendment to the bylaws if the amendment would:

Affect the rights, privileges, preferences, restrictions or conditions of that class as to voting, dissolution, redemption or transfer of memberships in a manner different than the amendment would affect another class;

Change the rights, privileges, preferences, restrictions or conditions of that class as to voting, dissolution, redemption or transfer by changing the rights, privileges, preferences, restrictions or conditions of another class;

Increase or decrease the number of memberships authorized for that class;

Increase the number of memberships authorized for another class;

Effect an exchange, reclassification or termination of all or part of the memberships of that class; or

Authorize a new class of memberships.

If a class is to be divided into two (2) or more classes as a result of an amendment to the bylaws, the amendment must be approved by the members of each class that would be created by the amendment.

If a class vote is required to approve an amendment to the bylaws, the amendment must be approved by the members of the class by two thirds (2/3) of the votes cast by the class or a majority of the voting power of the class, whichever is less.

A class of members is entitled to the voting rights granted by this section although the charter and bylaws provide that the class may not vote on the proposed amendment.

Acts 1987, ch. 242, § 10.24.

Textbooks. Tennessee Forms (Robinson, Ramsey and Harwell), Nos. 5-1503, 5-1603.

48-60-206. Amendment to bylaws may not divert property held in trust for charitable purpose from that purpose — Exception — Financial benefit in connection with bylaws amendment prohibited — Exception.

Property held in trust by a corporation or otherwise dedicated to a charitable purpose may not be diverted from its purpose by an amendment of its bylaws unless the corporation obtains an appropriate order of a court of competent jurisdiction to the extent required by and pursuant to the law of this state on cy pres or otherwise dealing with the nondiversion of charitable assets.

Unless a corporation, after notifying the attorney general and reporter obtains an appropriate order of a court of competent jurisdiction under the law of this state on cy pres or otherwise dealing with the nondiversion of charitable assets, an amendment of its bylaws may not affect:

Any restriction imposed upon property held by the corporation by virtue of any trust under which it holds that property; or

The existing rights of persons other than its members.

A person who is a member or otherwise affiliated with a public benefit corporation may not receive a direct or indirect financial benefit in connection with an amendment of the bylaws unless the person is itself a public benefit corporation or an unincorporated entity with a charitable purpose. This subsection (c) does not apply to the receipt of reasonable compensation for services rendered.

Acts 2014, ch. 899, § 63; 2016, ch. 688, § 3.